Maryland, session 2026, SB0582.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Commercial Law
14–1330.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “CREDITOR” MEANS A PERSON THAT ENGAGES IN
WHOLE OR IN PART IN THE BUSINESS OF MAKING LOANS OR OTHER EXTENSIONS OF
CREDIT FOR PERSONAL, FAMILY, OR HOUSEHOLD PURPOSES THIS SECTION DOES
NOT APPLY TO A PERSON THAT SENDS A TO AN INDIVIDUAL:
(1) A CONVENIENCE CHECK TO AN INDIVIDUAL FOR THE SOLE
PURPOSE OF ACCESSING AN EXISTING CREDIT LINE OF THE INDIVIDUAL; OR
(2) A PRESCREENED FIRM OFFER OF UNSECURED CREDIT SUBJECT TO
REGULATION UNDER THE FEDERAL FAIR CREDIT REPORTING ACT.
(B) A CREDITOR PERSON MAY NOT SEND A CHECK OR OTHER NEGOTIABLE
INSTRUMENT TO AN INDIVIDUAL IF:
(1) (I) THE CHECK OR OTHER NEGOTIABLE INSTRUMENT IS SENT
IN CONNECTION WITH AN OFFER TO EXTEND SECURED CREDIT TO THE INDIVIDUAL;
AND
– 1 –

Ch. 316 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) (II) THE INDIVIDUAL HAS NOT SUBMITTED AN APPLICATION
FOR OR OTHERWISE REQUESTED THE EXTENSION OF SECURED CREDIT BEFORE
RECEIVING THE CHECK OR OTHER NEGOTIABLE INSTRUMENT; OR
(2) THE CHECK OR OTHER NEGOTIABLE INSTRUMENT IS SENT AS
PART OF AN UNSOLICITED OFFER TO PURCHASE REAL PROPERTY.
(C) AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS SENT A CHECK OR OTHER NEGOTIABLE
INSTRUMENT IN VIOLATION OF SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION IS NOT LIABLE
FOR THE AMOUNT OF THE CHECK OR OTHER NEGOTIABLE INSTRUMENT UNLESS THE
INDIVIDUAL ACTUALLY RECEIVES AND NEGOTIATES THE CHECK OR OTHER
NEGOTIABLE INSTRUMENT.
(D) A CREDITOR PERSON THAT VIOLATES THIS SECTION IS GUILTY OF A
MISDEMEANOR AND ON CONVICTION SUBJECT TO A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $500.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 28, 2026.
– 2 –